Tennessee, session 114, SB0932.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-429, is amended by deleting
the language "December 1" and substituting "November 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0932
002984
- 1 -